Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1701.06
Failure or neglect to execute process; amercement; civil liability.

The sheriff shall execute every summons, order, or other process and return the same as required by law. If the sheriff fails to do so, unless he or she makes it appear to the satisfaction of the court that he or she was prevented by inevitable accident from so doing, he or she shall be amerced by the court in a sum not exceeding one thousand dollars and shall be liable to the action of any person aggrieved by such failure.

R.S.1867, Code § 891, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8565;

C.S.1922, § 9516;

C.S.1929, § 20-2217;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 25-2216;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 12.

Where judgment creditor fails to show any damage resulting from failure to make levy or return of execution, recovery against officer cannot be had. Ehlers v. Gallagher, 147 Neb. 97, 22 N.W.2d 396 (1946).

Where code is silent, common law and equity remedies, not inconsistent therewith, are applicable to prevent failure of justice. Cross-petition is maintainable. Armstrong v. Mayer, 69 Neb. 187, 95 N.W. 51 (1903).

"Return" includes certificates and delivery of writ to office from whence issued. Graves v. Macfarland, 58 Neb. 802, 79 N.W. 707 (1899).